District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.91

Liquidation proceedings — Procedure by court; authority of receivers; distribution of assets.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 217, ch. 269, § 91
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.91.
1981 Ed., § 29-391.
1973 Ed., § 29-931c.